en: Canned green pigeon peas
es: Gandules verdes en conserva
fr: Pois d'Angole verts en conserve
hr: Konzervirani zeleni golubovi grašak
nl: Duivenbonen in blik/pot

en: Canned peas, Canned garden peas
bg: Консервиран зелен грах
de: Erbsen in Dosen, Dosenerbsen
es: Guisantes en conserva
fi: purkitetut herneet
fr: Petits pois en conserve, Petits pois appertisés
hr: Konzervirani grašak
hu: Borsó konzervek
it: Piselli in scatola
nl: Doperwten in blik/pot
pl: Groszek konserwowy
ru: Горошек консервированный, зелёный горошек консервированный, консервированный зелёный горошек

en: Canned peas and carrots, Canned carrots and peas, Canned garden peas and carrots
bg: Консервиран зелен грах и моркови
de: Erbsen und Karotten in Dosen, Karotten und Erbsen in Dosen
es: Guisantes y zanahorias en conserva
fi: purkitetut herneet ja porkkanat
fr: Petits pois et carottes en conserve, Carottes et petits pois en conserve, Petits pois et carottes appertisés égouttés
hr: Konzervirani grašak i mrkva
it: Piselli e carote in scatola
nl: Doperwten met worteltjes in blik/pot

en: Legume pickles, Pickled legumes
es: Leguminosas encurtidas, Legumbres encurtidas
fi: säilötyt palkokasvit
fr: Pickles de légumineuses
hr: Mahunarke kiseli krastavci
nl: Zoetzure bonen

en: Pickled lupin beans, Pickled lupins
de: Eingelegte Lupinen
es: Altramuces encurtidos
fr: Tramousses, Graines de lupin saumurées
hr: Ukiseljene bobe lupine
nl: Ingemaakte lupine

en: Fresh legume sprouts
es: Germinados de leguminosas frescos
fr: Pousses de légumineuses fraîches
hr: Svježe klice mahunarki
nl: Peulvruchtenkiemen

en: Fresh alfalfa sprouts
es: Germinados de alfalfa frescos, Brotes de alfalfa frescos
fr: Pousses de luzerne fraîches, pousses d'alfalfa fraîches, Pousses de luzerne cultivée fraîches
hr: Svježe klice lucerne
nl: Alfalfakiemen
pl: Świeże kiełki lucerny

en: Fresh mung bean sprouts
es: Germinados de judía mungo frescos, Brotes de judía mungo frescos, Brotes de soja verde frescos
fr: Pousses de haricot mungo frais
hr: Svježe klice mung graha
nl: Mungboonkiemen
pl: Świeże kiełki fasoli mung

en: Canned legume sprouts
de: Eingelegte Hülsenfruchtsprossen
es: Germinados de leguminosas en conserva
fi: purkitetut palkokasvin idut
fr: Pousses de légumineuses en conserve
hr: Konzervirane klice mahunarki
it: Germogli di legumi in scatola
nl: Peulvruchtenkiemen in blik/pot

en: Canned mung bean sprouts, Canned sprouted mung beans, Canned soy sprouts
es: Germinados de judía mungo en conserva, Brotes de judía mungo en conserva, Brotes de soja verde en conserva
fi: Purkitetut mungpavun idut
fr: Pousses de haricot mungo en conserve, Haricots mungo germés en conserve, Haricots mungo germés appertisés, Pousses de soja en conserve, Pousses de soja appertisées
hr: Konzervirane klice mung graha
it: Germogli di fagiolo mungo in scatola, Germogli di soia in scatola
nl: Mungoboonkiemen in blik/pot

en: Canned alfalfa sprouts
es: Germinados de alfalfa en conserva, Brotes de alfalfa en conserva
fr: Pousses d'alfalfa en conserve, Pousses de luzerne cultivée en conserve
hr: Konzervirane klice lucerne
nl: Alfalfakiemen in blik/pot

en: Legume flakes, Rolled legumes
de: Hülsenfrüchteflocken, Flocken aus Hülsenfrüchten
es: Copos de leguminosas
fr: Flocons de légumineuses
hr: Pahuljice mahunarki
nl: Peulvruchtenvlokken

en: Soy flakes, Soya flakes
de: Sojaflocken
es: Copos de soja
fr: Flocons de soja
hr: Sojine ljuskice
nl: Sojavlokken

en: Legume flours
es: Harinas de leguminosas
fi: palkokasvijauhot
fr: Farines de légumineuses
he: קמחי קטניות, קמח קטניות
hr: Brašna mahunarki
it: Farine di legumi
nl: Peulvruchtenmelen

en: Chickpea flours, Garbanzo flours, Chick pea flours
de: Kichererbsenmehle
es: Harinas de garbanzos
fr: Farines de pois chiche, Farine de pois chiche
hr: Brašna od slanutka
it: Farine di ceci
ja: ひよこ豆粉
nl: Kikkererwtenmelen

en: Fresh broad flours
es: Harinas de habas
fr: Farines de fèves
hr: Svježe široko brašno
nl: Tuinboonmelen

en: Green bean flours
es: Harinas de alubias, Harina de judías
fr: Farines de haricots
hr: Brašna zelenog graha
nl: Gewone boonmelen

en: Lentil flours
de: Linsenmehle
es: Harinas de lentejas
fr: Farines de lentilles
hr: Brašna od leće
nl: Linzenmelen

en: Lupin bean flours, Lupin flours
es: Harinas de altramuces
fr: Farines de lupin
hr: Brašna od boba lupine
nl: Lupinemelen

en: Soybean flours, Soya flour
bg: Соево брашно
da: Sojabønnemel
es: Harinas de soja
fr: Farines de soja
hr: Sojina brašna
ja: 大豆粉
nl: Sojaboonmelen, Sojabonenmelen